Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 5. EXEMPT PROPERTY AND LIENS

SUBTITLE B. LIENS

CHAPTER 60. NEWSPAPER EMPLOYEE'S LIEN

Sec. 60.001. LIEN. A worker in the editorial, reportorial, advertising, or business department of a newspaper, periodical, or other publication who labors or performs a service for the publication under a written or an oral contract with any person has a first lien under this chapter for the amount due under the contract.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3578, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 60.002. PROPERTY SUBJECT TO LIEN. The lien attaches to all products, papers, machinery, tools, fixtures, appurtenances, goods, wares, merchandise, subscription contracts, chattels, or other things of value that are created wholly or partly by the labor of the workers or that are necessarily connected with the performance of their labor or service and that are owned by or in possession of the person with whom the workers contracted.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3578, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.